Utah statutes.
53-2a-207.   Expenditures authorized by "state of emergency" declaration.

(1) (a)  The director may use funds authorized under this part to provide:

(i)  transportation to and from the disaster scene;

(ii)  accommodations at the disaster scene for prolonged incidents; and

(iii)  emergency purchase of response equipment and supplies in direct support of a disaster.

(b)  The commissioner may authorize the use of funds accrued under Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 10, Energy Emergency Powers of the Governor Act, only if the governor declares a state of emergency as provided under this part.

(2)  These funds may not be allocated to a political subdivision unless the political subdivision has demonstrated that it is beyond its capability to respond to the disaster and that no other resources are available in sufficient amount to meet the disaster.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

